Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB728.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 9502.1. Suspension of tax.Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the taxes imposed under section 9502 (relating to imposition of tax) and collected as provided in section 9004(b) (relating to imposition of tax, exemptions and deductions) shall not be imposed after the effective date of this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314